Wisconsin, session 2025, SB274.
do enact as follows:SB274,13Section 1. 15.405 (5g) of the statutes is amended to read:SB274,2,6415.405 (5g) Controlled substances board. There is created in the 5department of safety and professional services a controlled substances board 6consisting of the attorney general, the secretary of health services, and the 1secretary of agriculture, trade and consumer protection, or their designees; the 2chairperson of the pharmacy examining board, the chairperson of the medical 3examining board, the chairperson of the physician assistant affiliated credentialing 4board, the chairperson of the dentistry examining board, and the chairperson of the 5board of nursing, or a designee; and one psychiatrist and one pharmacologist 6appointed for 3-year terms.SB274,2,77